Utah statutes.
76-10-1003.   Selling goods under counterfeited trademark, trade name or
trade device.
Every person who sells or keeps for sale any goods upon or to which any
counterfeited trademark, trade name, or trade device has been affixed, after
it has been filed with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code,
intending to represent the goods as the genuine goods of another, knowing it
to be counterfeited, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
